Tennessee statutes. Title 53 Food, Drugs And Cosmetics
Part 2

Confiscation

53-11-201. Procedure in confiscation.

In all cases of seizure of any narcotic drugs or marijuana or any vehicle, aircraft or boat or other property subject to forfeiture under this chapter, the officer or other person making the seizure shall deliver a receipt to the person, if any, found in possession of the property or conveyance.

The receipt shall state a general description of the seized property or conveyance, the reasons for the seizure, the procedure by which recovery of the property or conveyance may be sought, including the time period in which a claim for recovery must be presented, and the consequences of failing to file within the time period.

If the person found in possession of the conveyance is not the sole unencumbered owner of the conveyance, the department of safety shall make a reasonable effort to notify the owner or lienholder of the seizure by furnishing all parties known to have an interest in the conveyance with a copy of the receipt.

A copy of the receipt shall be filed in the office of the department of safety and shall be open to the public for inspection.

In all cases of seizure under subdivision (a)(1) involving a commercial vehicle or common carrier, any cargo or products transported by the commercial vehicle or common carrier shall not be subject to forfeiture, unless the cargo or products are otherwise subject to forfeiture under this chapter, or any other law of this state or the federal government. The cargo or products shall, upon request, immediately be made available for release to the owner or transporting agent.

All property seized and forfeited under this chapter shall be sold at public sale by the commissioner of general services when seized by an agency of the state or a campus police officer as defined in § 49-7-118, or, if seized by a county or municipality, by the seizing agency of the county or municipality when the seized and forfeited property has been released by the commissioner of safety as now authorized by law.

However, any vehicle seized by an agency of the state and forfeited under this chapter may, with the permission of the commissioner of safety and under terms and conditions approved by the commissioner of safety, be used, for a period of time not to exceed one (1) year, in the drug enforcement program of the state.

No vehicle seized by an agency of the state and forfeited under this chapter shall be used in the county or municipality in which it was seized.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b)(2)(B) to the contrary, any vehicle seized by a county or municipal agency and forfeited under title 40, chapter 33, part 2, may be used in the local drug enforcement program for a period not to exceed five (5) years.

Any person claiming any property seized as contraband goods may, within thirty (30) days after receipt of notification of seizure, file with the commissioner at Nashville a claim in writing, requesting a hearing and stating the person's interest in the articles seized.

The claimant shall also file with the claimant's claim a cost bond with one (1) or more good and solvent sureties in the sum of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), the bond being made payable to the state.

An indigent person may file the claim in forma pauperis by filing with the claim an affidavit stating that the indigent person is unable to bear the cost of the proceeding.

Within thirty (30) days from the day the claim is filed, the commissioner shall establish a hearing date and set the case on the docket.

Nothing in subdivision (d)(1)(A) shall be construed as requiring the hearing to be conducted within the thirty-day period.

At each hearing, the state shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the seized property was of a nature making its possession illegal or was used in a manner making it subject to forfeiture under this chapter, and failure to carry the burden of proof shall operate as a bar to any forfeiture under this chapter.

If the ruling of the commissioner is favorable to the claimant, the commissioner shall deliver to the claimant the vehicle and any other property seized that is not contraband, and the claimant shall not be required to pay any of the expenses incurred in the storage, transportation, and impoundment of the seized property.

If the ruling of the commissioner is adverse to the claimant, the commissioner shall proceed to sell or dispose of the contraband goods in accordance with this section and the expenses incurred in the storage, transportation, and impoundment, of the property shall be adjudged as part of the cost of the proceeding in any manner the commissioner determines.

Whenever, in any proceeding under this section, a claim is filed for any property seized, as provided in this section, by an owner or other person asserting the interest of the owner, the commissioner shall not allow the claim unless and until the claimant proves that the claimant:

Has an interest in the property, which the claimant acquired in good faith; and

Had at no time any knowledge or reason to believe that it was being or would be used in violation of the laws of the United States or of the state relating to narcotic drugs or marijuana.

Whenever, in any proceeding under this section, a claim is filed for any property seized, as provided in this section, by a person who is the holder of a security interest or other claim arising out of a contract or agreement, the commissioner shall not allow the claim unless and until the claimant proves that the claimant has an interest in the property, which the claimant acquired in good faith. An interest that is acquired in the ordinary course of business shall be presumed to be in good faith unless the commissioner receives evidence that the holder of the security interest had knowledge, at the time the interest attached, of the intended illegal use of the vehicle or was a co-conspirator in furtherance of the illegal activity. A holder of a security interest that is other than a natural person shall be considered a co-conspirator for purposes of this section, if evidence shows that an officer, employee or agent of the holder acting within the scope of employment is a co-conspirator, and the holder either:

Has actual knowledge of the illegal activities of the officer, employee or agent from an individual other than the officer, employee or agent and fails to take appropriate action; or

Has failed to reasonably supervise or monitor the activities of the holder's officer, employee or agent.

In the event the interest of the owner is forfeited, as provided in subdivision (f)(1), and the interest of the holder of a security interest is not forfeited as provided in subdivision (f)(2), the commissioner may, at the request of the holder of the security interest, return the property to the holder for disposition in accordance with the applicable security agreement or other contract. If the commissioner does not return the property to the holder, the forfeiture shall be subject to the holder's interest.

Pending any proceeding to recover a vehicle, aircraft or boat seized under this chapter, the commissioner may order delivery of the vehicle, aircraft or boat to any claimant who shall establish the claimant's right to immediate possession of the vehicle, aircraft or boat, and who shall execute, with one (1) or more sureties approved by the commissioner, and deliver to the commissioner, a bond in favor of the state and for the payment of the NADA retail value of the vehicle, aircraft or boat as of the time of the hearing, and conditioned further that, if the vehicle, aircraft or boat is not returned at the time of hearing, the bond shall stand in lieu of and be forfeited in the same manner as the vehicle, aircraft or boat.

The commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, is authorized to appoint or designate a hearing officer to sit, and set the case on the docket, as the hearing officer at the request and in the absence of the commissioner for the purpose of conducting the hearing as the commissioner may deem necessary.

The hearing officer designated by the commissioner shall make findings of fact, conclusions of law, and recommendations for the issuance of the proposed order based on the findings, conclusions and recommendations.

If the commissioner concurs, the commissioner shall issue the order, or the commissioner may, upon review of the record, make findings, conclusions, and issue an order that, in the commissioner's discretion, the record justifies.

The commissioner, personally, may hold hearings that the commissioner deems proper.

The hearing officer is likewise empowered to subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance and the production of records, memoranda, papers and other documents at any hearing authorized under this section.

At all hearings provided for in this section, the commissioner or the hearing officer shall provide a stenographer or court reporter to take a stenographic record of the evidence adduced at the hearing.

The claimant shall be entitled to a copy of the stenographic record, upon application for a copy and upon paying the reasonable costs of the copy to be fixed by the commissioner.

The commissioner may make or publish other and further procedural rules and regulations, not inconsistent with this section, that the commissioner deems proper, governing any hearing provided for in this section.

If a law enforcement agency seizes a motor vehicle as the result of a violation of the drug control law, the agency may elect whether to go forward with the forfeiture proceeding through either an administrative agency or through a court having civil jurisdiction in the county where the seizure occurred.

Acts 1955, ch. 83, § 4; 1959, ch. 304, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 5; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 543, § 7; Acts 1973, ch. 358, §§ 1-3; 1976, ch. 499, § 1; T.C.A., § 52-1404; Acts 1986, ch. 738, § 3; 1989, ch. 475, §§ 1, 2; 1990, ch. 1037, § 1; 1992, ch. 842, §§ 1-5; 1993, ch. 218, § 1; 1995, ch. 514, § 1; 2007, ch. 106, § 5.

Cross-References. Drugs, criminal offenses, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Forfeiture of drugs, etc., §§ 53-11-203, 53-11-451.

Organized crime, title 39, ch. 12, part 2.

Procedure for seizing contraband in cases of seizure of tobacco products, § 67-4-1021.

Procedure for seizing contraband property in cases of seizure of alcoholic beverages, § 57-9-202.

Smoking offenses concerning children, §§ 39-15-407 — 39-15-413.

Use of drug law confiscations and fines to promote DARE program or other drug abuse prevention programs, § 39-17-420.

Law Reviews.

Asset Forfeiture in Practice: Legislative Reform and Financial Considerations (Patricia S. Wall and Lee Sarver), 37 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 24 (2001).

Forfeitures Under the Tennessee Drug Control Act (Lewis L. Laska), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1986).

Attorney General Opinions. The effect of the filing of a federal bankruptcy petition upon the commencement or continuation of confiscation proceedings against the individual filing for bankruptcy, OAG 91-62 (7/3/91).

Use of motor vehicles seized pursuant to § 55-10-403(k), OAG 99-190 (9/28/99).

Comparative Legislation. Drug control:

Ala. Code § 20-2-1 et seq.

Ark. Code § 20-64-301 et seq.

Ga. O.C.G.A. § 26-4-1 et seq.

Ky. Rev. Stat. Ann. § 218A.010 et seq.

Miss. Code Ann. § 41-29-101 et seq.

Va. Code § 54.1-3400 et seq.

Cited: Russell v. State, 556 S.W.2d 92, 1977 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 287 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1977); Merchants Bank v. State, Wildlife Resources Agency, 567 S.W.2d 476, 1978 Tenn. App. LEXIS 287 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1978); State v. Moses, 584 S.W.2d 825, 1979 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 273 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1979); Woodall v. Lawson, 784 S.W.2d 657, 1989 Tenn. App. LEXIS 762 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1989); Weaver v. v City of Knoxville (In re Thomas), 179 B.R. 523, 1995 Bankr. LEXIS 365 (Bankr. E.D. Tenn. 1995); Jones v. Greene, 946 S.W.2d 817, 1996 Tenn. App. LEXIS 772 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1996).

53-11-202. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 53-11-202 (Acts 1955, ch. 83, §§ 5, 6; 1981, ch. 449, § 2; T.C.A., §§ 52-1405, 52-1406), concerning review on appeal, was repealed by Acts 1986, ch. 738, § 3(b).

53-11-203. Procedure final when no claim interposed.

If no claim is interposed, narcotic drugs, marijuana or other property shall be forfeited without further proceedings and the drugs, marijuana or other property shall be sold or disposed of as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1955, ch. 83, § 6; T.C.A., § 52-1406.

Law Reviews.

Forfeitures Under the Tennessee Drug Control Act (Lewis L. Laska), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1986).

53-11-204. Disposition of proceeds.

The proceeds of all seizures, confiscations and sales made by a state agency pursuant to this chapter shall be transmitted to the state treasurer and deposited in the state treasury; provided, that upon application of the commissioner, the proceeds or any part of the proceeds may be allocated by the commissioner of finance and administration to the department of safety as expendable receipts for use in the enforcement of this chapter and the other laws of this state regulating narcotic drugs and marijuana.

Acts 1955, ch. 83, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1961, ch. 97, § 3; Acts 1976, ch. 499, § 2; T.C.A., § 52-1407.

Cross-References. Confiscation procedure, § 53-11-201.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4 and title 53, ch. 11, parts 3 and 4.

Drug crimes, fines and forfeitures, § 39-17-420.

Goods subject to forfeiture, seizure, disposition, § 53-11-451.

Racketeer influenced and corrupt organizations, title 39, ch. 12, part 2.

Real property subject to forfeiture, § 53-11-452.